Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 561.6 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any elected official or religious leader of this state shall be
permitted to enter any facility operated by a private prison
contractor, as such term is defined in subparagraph b of paragraph 8
of Section 502 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, in this state
for the purpose of informal inspections upon request. A request to
enter a private prison shall be made at least three (3) calendar
days in advance of the visit. Such official or religious leader
shall first verify his or her identity and official capacity before
admittance to the private prison. For the purposes of this section,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1470 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

“ele cted official” means a person elected to a state office in the
legislative or executive branch of this state and “religious leader”
means an individual who is associated with, and is an authorized
representative of, a recognized church or religious denomination
with a physical location in this state, including, but not limited
to, a clergy member, minister, pastor, priest, rabbi, or imam.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1470 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)